California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(a) At the time of application for Medi-Cal benefits, the department shall provide to any applicant who is aged, blind, or disabled, other than an individual applying for, or receiving, aid under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200), Article 5 (commencing with Section 12200) of Chapter 3, or Article 7 (commencing with Section 12300) of Chapter 3, and to the applicant’s spouse, legal representative, or agent, if any, a clear and simple statement, in writing, in a form and language specified by the department, that explains the
 circumstances under which an interest in a home may be transferred for less than fair market value without affecting Medi-Cal eligibility.

(b) The statement required by subdivision (a) shall be in the following form:

“NOTICE REGARDING TRANSFER OF A HOME FOR BOTH A MARRIED AND AN UNMARRIED APPLICANT/BENEFICIARY

A transfer of property interest for less than fair market value in a Medi-Cal beneficiary’s home will not cause ineligibility for Medi-Cal benefits if at the time of the transfer, the home would have been considered an exempt resource.

This is only a brief description of the Medi-Cal eligibility rules. For more detailed information, you should call your county welfare department. You will probably want to consult with an attorney, your local legal services program for seniors, or the local branch of the
 long-term care ombudsman program.

I have read the above notice and have received a copy.Dated: ______ Signature: _________” 

(c) The statement required by subdivision (a) shall be printed in at least 12-point type, shall be clearly separate from any other document or writing, and may be signed by the applicant, the applicant’s spouse, legal representative, or agent, if any. Failure to sign this form shall not result in ineligibility for medical assistance.

(d) The department may revise this statement as necessary to maintain its consistency with state and federal law.

(e) In the case of an applicant applying for Medi-Cal reimbursement for nursing facility care, the statements
 required under Sections 14006.2 and 14006.3 shall apply, and the statement required by subdivision (a) shall not be provided.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 556, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

14007.

No period of residence in this state shall be required as a condition of eligibility under this chapter, but an individual who does not reside in this state shall not be eligible.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 21.)
-------------------------------------------

14007.1.

(a) The department shall electronically verify an individual’s state residency using information from the federal Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program, the CalWORKs program, the California Health Benefit Exchange, the Franchise Tax Board, the Department of Motor Vehicles, the Employment Development Department, or the electronic service established in accordance with Section 435.949 of Title 42 of
 the Code of Federal Regulations, and other available sources. If the department is unable to electronically verify an individual’s state residency using these electronic data sources, an individual shall verify state residency as set forth in this section.

(b) If the individual is 21 years of age or older, is capable of indicating intent, and is not residing in an institution, state residency is established when the individual provides one of the following:

(1) A recent California rent or mortgage receipt or utility bill in the individual’s name.

(2) A current California motor vehicle driver’s license or California Identification Card issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles in the individual’s name.

(3) A current California motor vehicle registration
 in the individual’s name.

(4) A document showing that the individual is employed in this state or is seeking employment in the state.

(5) A document showing that the individual has registered with a public or private employment service in this state.

(6) Evidence that the individual has enrolled his or her children in a school in this state.

(7) Evidence that the individual is receiving public assistance in this state. For purposes of this paragraph, “public assistance” shall not include unemployment insurance benefits.

(8) Evidence of registration to vote in this state.

(9) A declaration by the individual under penalty of
 perjury that he or she intends to reside in this state and does not have a fixed address and cannot provide any of the documents identified in paragraphs (1) to (8), inclusive.

(10) A declaration by the individual under penalty of perjury that he or she has entered the state with a job commitment or is seeking employment in the state and cannot provide any of the documents identified in paragraphs (1) to (8), inclusive.

(c) If the individual is 21 years of age or older, is incapable of indicating intent, and is not residing in an institution, state residency is established when the parent, legal guardian of the individual, or any other person with knowledge declares, under penalty of perjury, that the individual is residing in this state.

(d) If the individual is 21 years of age or older, is residing in an
 institution, and became incapable of indicating intent before reaching 21 years of age, state residency is established by any of the following:

(1) When the parent applying for Medi-Cal on the individual’s behalf (A) declares under penalty of perjury that the individual’s parents reside in separate states and (B) establishes that he or she (the parent) is a resident of this state in accordance with the requirements of this section.

(2) When the legal guardian applying for Medi-Cal on the individual’s behalf (A) declares under penalty of perjury that parental rights have been terminated and (B) establishes that he or she (the legal guardian) is a resident of this state in accordance with the requirements of this section.

(3) When the parent or parents applying for Medi-Cal on the individual’s behalf establishes in
 accordance with the requirements of this section that he, she, or they (the parent or parents), were a resident of this state at the time the individual was placed in the institution.

(4) When the legal guardian applying for Medi-Cal on the individual’s behalf (A) declares under penalty of perjury that parental rights have been terminated and (B) establishes in accordance with the requirements of this section that he or she (the legal guardian) was a resident of this state at the time the individual was placed in the institution.

(5) When the parent, or parents, applying for Medi-Cal on the individual’s behalf (A) provides a document from the institution that demonstrates that the individual is institutionalized in this state and (B) establishes in accordance with the requirements of this section that he, she, or they (the parent or parents), are a resident of this state.

(6) When the legal guardian applying for Medi-Cal on the individual’s behalf (A) provides a document from the institution that demonstrates that the individual is institutionalized in this state, (B) declares under penalty of perjury that parental rights have been terminated, and (C) establishes in accordance with the requirements of this section that he or she (the legal guardian) is a resident of this state.

(7) When the individual or party applying for Medi-Cal on the individual’s behalf (A) provides a document from the institution that demonstrates that the individual is institutionalized in this state, (B) declares under penalty of perjury that the individual has been abandoned by his or her parents and does not have a legal guardian, and (C) establishes that he or she (the individual or party applying for Medi-Cal on the individual’s behalf) is a resident of this state in
 accordance with the requirements of this section.

(e) Except when another state has placed the individual in the institution, if the individual is 21 years of age or older, is residing in an institution, and became incapable of indicating intent on or after reaching 21 years of age, state residency is established when the person filing the application on the individual’s behalf provides a document from the institution that demonstrates that the individual is institutionalized in this state.

(f) If the individual is 21 years of age or older, is capable of indicating intent, and is residing in an institution, state residency is established when the individual (1) provides a document from the institution that demonstrates that the individual is institutionalized in this state, and (2) declares under penalty of perjury that he or she intends to reside in this state.

(g) If the individual is under 21 years of age, is married or emancipated from his or her parents, is capable of indicating intent, and is not residing in an institution, state residency is established in accordance with subdivision (b).

(h) If the individual is under 21 years of age, is not living in an institution, and is not described in subdivision (g), state residency is established by any of the following:

(1) When the individual resides with his or her parent or parents and the parent or parents establish that he, she, or they (the parent or parents) are a resident of this state in accordance with the requirements of subdivision (b).

(2) When the individual resides with a caretaker relative or caretaker relatives and the caretaker relative or
 caretaker relatives establish that he, she, or they (the caretaker relative or caretaker relatives), are a resident of this state in accordance with the requirements of subdivision (b).

(3) When the person with whom the individual is residing is not the individual’s parent or caretaker relative and he or she (A) declares under penalty of perjury that the individual is residing with him or her, and (B) establishes that he or she (the person with whom the individual is residing) is a resident of this state in accordance with the requirements of subdivision (b).

(4) When the individual does not reside with his or her parents or with a caretaker relative and he or she declares under penalty of perjury that he or she is living in this state.

(i) If the individual is under 21 years of age, is institutionalized, and is not
 married or emancipated, state residency is established in accordance with paragraph (3), (4), (5), (6), or (7) of subdivision (d).

(j) A denial of a determination of residency may be appealed in the same manner as any other denial of eligibility. The administrative law judge shall receive any proof of residency offered by the individual and may inquire into any facts relevant to the question of residency. A determination of residency shall not be granted unless a preponderance of the credible evidence supports that the individual is a resident of this state under Section 14007.15.

(k) To the extent otherwise required by Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department shall adopt emergency regulations implementing this section no later than July 1, 2015. The department may thereafter readopt the emergency
 regulations pursuant to that chapter. The adoption and readoption, by the department, of regulations implementing this section shall be deemed to be an emergency and necessary to avoid serious harm to the public peace, health, safety, or general welfare for purposes of Sections 11346.1 and 11349.6 of the Government Code, and the department is hereby exempted from the requirement that it describe facts showing the need for immediate action and from review by the Office of Administrative Law.

(l) For purposes of this section, the definitions in subdivision (i) of Section 14007.15 shall apply.

(m) This section shall be implemented only if and to the extent that federal financial participation is available and any necessary federal approvals have been obtained.

(n) This section shall become operative on January 1,
 2014.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 71, Sec. 195.   (SB 1304)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

14007.12.

(a) No later than January 1, 2027, the department shall establish a process to regularly obtain address information for individuals enrolled in the Medi-Cal program in accordance with Section 1396a(vv) of Title 42 of the United States Code for the purpose of preventing simultaneous enrollment under Medicaid state plans or waivers of multiple states.

(b) (1) The process described in subdivision (a) to regularly obtain address information for individuals enrolled in the Medi-Cal program shall obtain address information from reliable data sources described in paragraph (2) and take actions as the United States Secretary of Health and Human Services specifies with respect to any changes to the address based on the
 information.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, the following are reliable data sources:

(A) Mail returned to the state by the United States Postal Service with a forwarding address.

(B) The National Change of Address Database maintained by the United States Postal Service.

(C) A managed care entity, as defined in Section 1396u-2(a)(1)(B) of Title 42 of the United States Code, or prepaid inpatient health plan or prepaid ambulatory health plan, as these terms are defined in Section 1396b(m)(9)(D) of Title 42 of the United States Code, that has a contract under the Medi-Cal program if the address information is provided to the entity or plan directly from, or verified by the entity or plan directly with, the individual.

(D) Other data sources as identified by the department and approved by the United States Secretary of Health and Human Services.

(c) Beginning January 1, 2027, each contract under the Medi-Cal program with a managed care entity, as defined in Section 1396u-2(a)(1)(B) of Title 42 of the United States Code, or with a prepaid inpatient health plan or prepaid ambulatory health plan, as these terms are defined in Section 1396b(m)(9)(D) of Title 42 of the United States Code, shall provide that the entity or plan shall promptly transmit to the county any address information for an individual enrolled with the entity or plan that is provided to the entity or plan directly from, or verified by the entity or plan directly with, the individual.

(d) At least 10 days before terminating Medi-Cal eligibility, the department shall send
 residency verification letters to members requesting that members contact the department to verify their residency and receipt of benefits only in California, informing members about the methods to report this information, and that they shall be granted the 90-day cure period.

(e) (1) This section shall be implemented only after the director determines, and communicates in writing to the Department of Finance, that systems have been programmed for implementation of this section.

(2) This section shall be implemented only to the extent that any necessary federal approvals are obtained and that federal financial participation is available and not otherwise jeopardized.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 27, Sec. 76.   (SB 164)   Effective June 29, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

14007.15.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (f), an individual is a resident of this state if he or she is 21 years of age or older, is not residing in an institution, is living in the state, and any of the following apply:

(1) The individual intends to reside in this state, including individuals who do not have a fixed address.

(2) The individual has entered this state with a job commitment or is seeking employment in this state, regardless of whether he or she is currently employed.

(3) The individual is incapable of indicating intent.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (f), an individual that is 21 years of age or older, is residing in an institution, and became incapable of indicating intent before reaching 21 years of age is a resident of this state if any of the following apply:

(1) The individual’s parents reside in separate states and the parent applying for Medi-Cal on the individual’s behalf is a resident of this state under this section.

(2) The parental rights have been terminated and a legal guardian has been appointed for the individual and the
 legal guardian applying for Medi-Cal on the individual’s behalf is a resident of this state under this section.

(3) The individual’s parent or parents, or legal guardian if parental rights have been terminated, was a resident of this state under this section at the time the individual was placed in the institution.

(4) The individual is institutionalized in this state and the parent or parents, or legal guardian if parental rights have been terminated, applying for Medi-Cal on the individual’s behalf is a resident of this state under this section.

(5) The individual is institutionalized in this state, has been abandoned by his or her parent or parents, does not have a legal guardian, and the individual or party that filed the Medi-Cal application on the individual’s behalf is a resident of this state under this
 section.

(c) Except as provided in subdivision (f) and except where another state has placed the individual in the institution, an individual is a resident of this state if he or she is 21 years of age or older, is institutionalized in this state, and became incapable of indicating intent on or after reaching 21 years of age.

(d) Except as provided in subdivision (f), an individual is a resident of this state if he or she is 21 years of age or older, is institutionalized in this state, and intends to reside in this state.

(e) Except as provided in subdivision (f), an individual that is under 21 years of age is a resident of this state if one of the following apply:

(1) The individual is not residing in an institution, is capable of indicating intent, is
 married or is emancipated from his or her parents, is living in this state, and one of the following apply:

(A) The individual intends to reside in this state, which includes an individual who does not have a fixed address.

(B) The individual has entered this state with a job commitment or is seeking employment in this state, regardless of whether he or she is currently employed.

(2) The individual is not described in paragraph (1) and is not living in an institution, and any of the following apply:

(A) The individual resides in this state, including without a fixed address.

(B) The individual resides with his or her parent or parents or a caretaker relative who is a resident of this state
 under this section.

(3) The individual is institutionalized, is not married or emancipated, and any of the following apply:

(A) The individual’s parent or parents, or legal guardian if parental rights have been terminated, was a resident of this state under this section at the time of placement in the institution.

(B) The individual is institutionalized in this state and his or her parent or parents, or legal guardian if parental rights have been terminated, who files the application on the individual’s behalf is a resident of this state under this section.

(C) The individual is institutionalized in this state, has been abandoned by his or her parents, does not have a legal guardian, and the individual or party that files the application on the
 individual’s behalf is a resident of this state under this section.

(f) An individual who is receiving a state supplementary payment (SSP) is a resident of the state paying the SSP.

(g) An individual who lives in this state and is receiving foster care or adoption assistance under Title IV-E of the federal Social Security Act is a resident of this state.

(h) (1) If this state or an agent of this state arranges for an individual to be placed in an institution located in another state, the individual is a resident of this state.

(2) The following actions do not constitute a placement by this state:

(A) Providing basic information to the individual about another state’s
 Medicaid program and information about the availability of health care services and facilities in another state.

(B) Assisting an individual to locate an institution in another state when the individual is capable of indicating intent and independently decides to move to the other state.

(3) When a competent individual leaves the facility in which he or she was placed by this state, that individual’s state of residence is the state where the individual is physically located.

(4) If this state initiates a placement in another state because it lacks an appropriate facility to provide services to the individual, the individual is a resident of this state.

(i) For the purposes of this section and Section 14007.1, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Incapable of indicating intent” means when an individual is considered to be any of the following:

(A) Determined to have an I.Q. of 49 or less or to have a mental age of 7 years or younger based upon tests administered by a properly licensed mental health or developmental disabilities professional.

(B) Found to be incapable of indicating intent based on medical documentation provided by a physician, psychologist, or other person licensed by the state in the field of mental health or developmental disabilities.

(C) Been judicially determined to be legally incompetent.

(2) “Institution” shall have the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 435.1010 of Title 42 of the Code of
 Federal Regulations. For the purposes of determining residency under subdivision (h), the term also includes licensed foster care homes providing food, shelter, and supportive services to one or more persons unrelated to the proprietor.

(j) To the extent otherwise required by Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department shall adopt emergency regulations implementing this section no later than July 1, 2015. The department may thereafter readopt the emergency regulations pursuant to that chapter. The adoption and readoption, by the department, of regulations implementing this section shall be deemed to be an emergency and necessary to avoid serious harm to the public peace, health, safety, or general welfare for purposes of Sections 11346.1 and 11349.6 of the Government Code, and the department is hereby exempted from the requirement that it describe facts showing the need
 for immediate action and from review by the Office of Administrative Law.

(k) This section shall be implemented only if and to the extent that federal financial participation is available and any necessary federal approvals have been obtained.

(l) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2014.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 4, Sec. 18.   (SB 1 1x)   Effective September 30, 2013.   Section operative January 1, 2014, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

14007.2.

(a) Any individual who is otherwise eligible for Medi-Cal services, but who does not meet the documentation requirements described in subdivision (e) of Section 14011.2, shall be eligible only for the scope of services made available to persons who are not citizens or nationals of the United States under subdivision (d) of Section 14007.5, and Sections 14007.65, 14007.7, and 14007.8.

(b) To the extent that federal financial participation is available to fund services described under subdivision (a), the department shall file all necessary state plan amendments or waivers to obtain that funding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 296, Sec. 71.   (AB 1096)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

14007.4.

Any children under the jurisdiction of the county welfare department, who are dependent children in relative placement, foster home placement, or group home placement, and any child in custody pending the filing of a petition for placement, who are receiving or are eligible to receive services from the county welfare department, shall be deemed to have met the residence requirements for services under this chapter, and no further verification of residence shall be required.

This section shall be implemented only to the extent that full federal financial participation is made available.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 630, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

14007.45.

(a) To the extent federal financial participation is available, the department shall exercise the option provided in Section 1920A of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396r-1a) to the extent necessary to implement a program for accelerated eligibility for children who are in the process of entering the foster care system.

(b) The department shall designate county foster care workers, public health nurses, or other staff who are involved in the children’s
 removal from the home as a qualified entity capable of making an eligibility determination under Section 1920A of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396r-1a).

(c) The qualified entity shall have access to the Medi-Cal Eligibility Data System to determine whether the child for whom the petition of dependency was filed is eligible for Medi-Cal. If the child is not currently eligible for Medi-Cal, the qualified entity shall have the authority to enter the child’s information into the Medi-Cal Eligibility Data System to ensure timely issuance of either a Medi-Cal card or Medi-Cal Benefits Identification Card thereby ensuring immediate proof of or access to proof of Medi-Cal eligibility.

(d) The department shall seek any state plan amendments necessary to implement this section. Once federal approval of all necessary state plan amendments is received, implementation shall
 begin on the first day of the month that follows the full calendar month after the month federal approval is received.

(e) In the event that the state plan amendment necessary to implement this section is disapproved by the federal government, the department shall instruct counties on all available procedures for expediting eligibility applications for children described in subdivision (a) and for immediately issuing sufficient proof of eligibility to ensure that eligibility of children entering the foster care system can be immediately confirmed by providers.

(f) If the federal waiver described in Section 12693.755 of the Insurance Code for covering parents under the State Children’s Health Insurance Program is approved, and if the option under Section 1920A of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396r-1a) is exercised to extend accelerated eligibility to all children
 as part of implementation of that waiver, and if the state plan amendment for implementation of this section is disapproved, then the department shall have discretion to determine whether and under what circumstances foster care workers who complete the application form described in subdivision (e) shall submit that form to the qualified entity for accelerated eligibility rather than to the county Medi-Cal eligibility worker.

(g) This section shall be implemented only if and to the extent that federal financial participation is available.

(h) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department shall implement, without taking any regulatory action, this section by means of all-county letters or similar instructions. Thereafter, the department shall adopt regulations in accordance with the requirements
 of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 171, Sec. 32.5.   Effective August 10, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

14007.5.

(a) Persons who are not citizens or nationals of the United States shall be eligible for Medi-Cal, whether federally funded or state-funded, only to the same extent as permitted under federal law and regulations for receipt of federal financial participation under Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act, except as otherwise provided in this section and elsewhere in this chapter.

(b) (1) Through September 30, 2026, an individual who is not a citizen or a national of the United States who has the immigration status described in
 Section
 1641 of Title 8 of the United States Code shall be eligible for the full scope of Medi-Cal benefits.

(2) Beginning October 1, 2026, an individual described in paragraph (1) shall only be eligible for the full scope of Medi-Cal benefits if that individual meets either of the following criteria:

(A) The individual is described in Section 1396b(v)(5) of Title 42 of the United States Code and is not subject to the limitation described in Section 1613(a) of Title 8 of the United States Code.

(B) The individual receives supplemental security income under Title XVI of the federal Social Security Act.

(c) (1) Beginning October 1, 2026, and through June 30, 2027, an individual described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b), but not described in Section 1396b(v)(5) of Title 42 of the United States Code, shall be eligible for the full scope of Medi-Cal state-funded benefits.

(2) Beginning July 1, 2027, an individual who has an immigration status described in Section 1641 of Title 8 of the United States Code, but is not described in Section 1396b(v)(5) of Title 42 of the United States Code shall only be eligible for medically necessary pregnancy-related services, and care and services necessary for the treatment of an emergency medical condition and medical care directly related to the emergency, as defined in federal law.

(d) (1) Beginning October 1, 2026, a person who has an immigration status described in
 paragraph (1) of subdivision (b), but who is subject to the limitation described in Section 1613(a) of Title 8 of the United States Code, shall be eligible for the full scope of Medi-Cal state-funded benefits, subject to the service limitations described in subdivision (p).

(2) An individual who is not described in subdivision (b) or (c), but who is permanently residing in the United States under color of law, shall be eligible for the full scope of Medi-Cal state-funded benefits, subject to the
 service limitations described in subdivision (p). For purposes of this section, persons who are not citizens or nationals of the United States and who are “permanently residing in the United States under color of law” shall be interpreted to include all persons who are not citizens or nationals of the United States residing in the United States with the knowledge and permission of the United States Department of Homeland Security and whose departure the United States Department of Homeland Security does not contemplate enforcing and with respect to whom federal financial participation is not available under Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act.

(e) Any person who is not a citizen or national of the United States who is otherwise eligible for
 Medi-Cal services, but who does not meet the requirements under subdivision (b), (c), or (d), shall only be eligible for care and services that are necessary for the treatment of an emergency medical condition and medical care directly related to the emergency, as defined in federal law, except as described in Sections 14007.65, 14007.7, and 14007.8. For purposes of this section, the term “emergency medical condition” means a medical condition manifesting itself by acute symptoms of sufficient severity, including severe pain, such that the absence of immediate medical attention could reasonably be expected to result in any of the following:

(1) Placing the patient’s health in serious jeopardy.

(2) Serious impairment to bodily functions.

(3) Serious dysfunction to any bodily organ or part. It is the intent of this
 section to entitle eligible individuals to inpatient and outpatient services that are necessary for the treatment of the emergency medical condition in the same manner as administered by the department through regulations and provisions of federal law.

(f) Effective October 1, 2026, for individuals described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) and subdivision (e), maintenance dialysis services medically necessary for the treatment of chronic dialysis and end-stage renal disease, and provided in a freestanding outpatient dialysis facility licensed under paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 1204 of the Health and Safety Code, or a hospital-based dialysis facility licensed under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 1250) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code, are covered services under this section, regardless of whether the treatment meets the definition
 of an emergency medical condition under subdivision (e) or Section 51056 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations. The services covered under this subdivision include medically necessary transportation to and from the facility for the purpose of receiving these services.

(g) To the extent that federal financial participation is unavailable for services described in subdivision (f), the department shall fund those services subject to an appropriation made by the Legislature, and coverage under subdivision (f) shall not be interrupted, reduced, or conditioned on the availability of federal financial participation.

(h) The department shall issue guidance to Medi-Cal fee-for-service providers implementing this section, and shall amend Section 51056 of Title 22 of the
 California Code of Regulations, or other applicable regulations, as necessary to conform to this section.

(i) (1) (A) No sooner than July 1, 2027, all individuals described in subdivisions (c) and (d), except for those individuals described in subparagraph (B), shall be required to pay a monthly premium as a condition of eligibility for the full scope of Medi-Cal benefits, subject to the service limitations described in subdivision
 (p), if they are otherwise eligible for benefits under this chapter.

(B) The following individuals are not subject to the monthly premium requirements described in subparagraph (A):

(i) Individuals under 19 years of age.

(ii) Individuals over 59 years of age.

(iii) Individuals who are pregnant or entitled to postpartum medical assistance.

(iv) Individuals enrolled in the county or state Medi-Cal Inmate Eligibility Program.

(2) No sooner than May 14, 2027, the Governor’s 2027–28 May Revision shall include the level of monthly premiums imposed under this subdivision, which shall be no
 less than thirty dollars ($30) and no greater than fifty dollars ($50) per beneficiary.

(3) An individual required to pay premiums pursuant to this subdivision, after no more than 90 days of nonpayment of the monthly premium, is only eligible for medically necessary pregnancy-related services, and care and services necessary for the treatment of an emergency medical condition and medical care directly related to the emergency, as defined in federal law. All outstanding premium balances shall be paid in full as a condition of continued eligibility for the full scope of Medi-Cal benefits.

(4) The monthly premium requirements and service limitations described in paragraphs (1), (2), and (3) shall not apply to nonminor dependents, as defined in Section 11400, and individuals who but for their immigration status are eligible for Medi-Cal pursuant to Section 14005.28. These individuals
 shall remain eligible for the full scope of Medi-Cal benefits until their 26th birthday.

(j) Pursuant to Section 14001.2, each county department shall require that each applicant for, or beneficiary of, Medi-Cal, including a child, shall provide their social security number account number, or numbers, if they have more than one social security number.

(k) (1) In order to be eligible for benefits under subdivision (b), (c), or (d), an applicant or beneficiary shall present United States Citizenship and Immigration Services registration documentation or other proof of satisfactory immigration status from the United States Citizenship and Immigration Services.

(2) Any person who meets all other program requirements but who lacks documentation of United States Citizenship and Immigration Services registration or other proof of satisfactory immigration status shall be provided a reasonable opportunity to submit the evidence. For purposes of this paragraph, “reasonable opportunity” means 90 days or the time it actually takes the county to process the Medi-Cal application, whichever is longer.

(3) During the reasonable opportunity period under paragraph (2), the county department shall process the
 applicant’s application for medical assistance in a manner that conforms to its normal processing procedures and timeframes.

(l) (1) The county department shall grant only the Medi-Cal benefits set forth in subdivision (e) of this section or in Section 14007.65, 14007.7, or 14007.8 to any individual who, after 30 calendar days or the time it actually takes the county to process the Medi-Cal application, whichever is longer, has failed to submit documents constituting reasonable evidence indicating a satisfactory immigration status for Medi-Cal purposes, or who is reported by the United States Citizenship and Immigration Services to lack a
 satisfactory immigration status for Medi-Cal purposes.

(2) If a person who is not a citizen or national of the United States has been receiving Medi-Cal benefits based on eligibility established prior to the effective date of this section and that individual, upon redetermination of eligibility for benefits, fails to submit documents constituting reasonable evidence indicating a satisfactory immigration status for Medi-Cal purposes, the county department shall discontinue the Medi-Cal benefits, except for the care and services set forth in subdivision (e) of this section or in Section 14007.65, 14007.7, or 14007.8. The county department shall provide adequate notice to the individual of any adverse action and shall accord the individual an opportunity for a fair hearing if the individual requests one.

(m) To the extent permitted by federal law and regulations, a person who is not a citizen or national of the United States applying for services under subdivisions (b), (c), or (d) shall be granted eligibility for the scope of services to which they would otherwise be entitled if, at the time the county department makes the determination about their eligibility, the person meets either of the following requirements:

(1) The person has not had a reasonable opportunity to submit documents constituting reasonable evidence indicating satisfactory immigration status.

(2) The person has provided documents constituting reasonable evidence indicating a satisfactory immigration status, but the county department has not
 received timely verification of the person’s immigration status from the United States Citizenship and Immigration Services.

(3) The verification process shall protect the privacy of all participants. A person’s immigration status shall be subject to verification by the United States Citizenship and Immigration Services, to the extent required for receipt of federal financial participation in the Medi-Cal program.

(n) If a person does not declare status as a lawful permanent resident or person permanently residing under color of law, or as a person legalized under Section 210, 210A, or 245A of the federal
 Immigration and Nationality Act (Public Law 82-414), Medi-Cal coverage under subdivision (e) of this section or in Section 14007.65, 14007.7, or 14007.8 shall be provided to the individual if they are otherwise eligible.
